Maine, session 132, LD584.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-B MRSA §104-B, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §6, is
amended to read:
The Governor shall appoint the Director of the Office of Cannabis Policy, referred to
in this chapter as "the director," subject to review by the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over cannabis matters and to confirmation by the
Legislature. The Director of the Office of Cannabis Policy, referred to in this chapter as
"the director," may employ personnel as necessary to implement, administer and enforce
this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter and the Maine Medical Use of
Cannabis Act and the rules adopted pursuant to that Act.
Sec. 2. Appointment. The Governor shall appoint the Director of the Office of
Cannabis Policy pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 28-B, section 104-B no later
than 60 days after the effective date of this Act.